Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE K. FOREIGN WILLS, OTHER TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENTS, AND FIDUCIARIES

CHAPTER 503. RECORDING OF FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENT

SUBCHAPTER A. REQUIREMENTS FOR RECORDING FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENT

Sec. 503.001. AUTHORIZATION TO RECORD CERTAIN FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENTS IN DEED RECORDS. (a) A copy of a will or other testamentary instrument that conveys, or in any other manner disposes of, land in this state and that has been probated according to the laws of any state of the United States or a country other than the United States, along with a copy of the judgment, order, or decree by which the instrument was admitted to probate that has the attestation, seal, and certificate required by Section 501.002(c), may be filed and recorded in the deed records in any county in this state in which the land is located:

(1) without further proof or authentication, subject to Section 503.003; and

(2) in the same manner as a deed or conveyance is required to be recorded under the laws of this state.

(b) A copy of a will or other testamentary instrument described by Subsection (a), along with a copy of the judgment, order, or decree by which the instrument was admitted to probate that has the attestation and certificate required by Section 501.002(c), is:

(1) prima facie evidence that the instrument has been admitted to probate according to the laws of the state or country in which it was allegedly admitted to probate; and

(2) sufficient to authorize the instrument and the judgment, order, or decree to be recorded in the deed records in the proper county or counties in this state.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 503.002. RECORDING OF CERTAIN FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENTS IN LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH. (a) An authenticated copy of a will or other testamentary instrument described by Section 503.001(a), along with a copy of the judgment, order, or decree by which the instrument was admitted to probate that has the attestation and certificate required by Section 501.002(c), that is written in whole or in part in a language other than English may be filed for recording in the deed records in any county in this state in which the land conveyed or disposed of in the instrument is located if:

(1) a correct English translation is recorded with the authenticated copies of the will or other testamentary instrument and judgment, order, or decree by which the instrument was admitted to probate; and

(2) the accuracy of the translation is sworn to before an officer authorized to administer oaths.

(b) The recording of an authenticated copy of a will or other testamentary instrument and a copy of the judgment, order, or decree in the manner provided by Subsection (a) operates as constructive notice from the date of filing to all persons of the:

(1) existence of the instrument; and

(2) title or titles conferred by the instrument.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 521 (S.B. 626), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 576 (S.B. 615), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 503.003. CONTEST OF RECORDED FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENT PERMITTED. The validity of a will or other testamentary instrument, a copy of which is filed and recorded as provided by Section 503.001, may be contested in the manner and to the extent provided by Subchapter A, Chapter 504.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. EFFECTS OF RECORDED FOREIGN

TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENT

Sec. 503.051. RECORDED FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENT AS CONVEYANCE. A copy of a foreign will or other testamentary instrument described by Section 503.001 and the copy of the judgment, order, or decree by which the instrument was admitted to probate that are attested and proved as provided by that section and delivered to the county clerk of the proper county in this state to be recorded in the deed records:

(1) take effect and are valid as a deed of conveyance of all property in this state covered by the instrument; and

(2) have the same effect as a recorded deed or other conveyance of land beginning at the time the instrument is delivered to the clerk to be recorded.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 503.052. RECORDED FOREIGN TESTAMENTARY INSTRUMENT AS NOTICE OF TITLE. A copy of a foreign will or other testamentary instrument described by Section 503.001 and the copy of the judgment, order, or decree by which the instrument was admitted to probate that is attested and proved as provided by that section and filed for recording in the deed records of the proper county in this state constitute notice to all persons of the:

(1) existence of the instrument; and

(2) title or titles conferred by the instrument.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 2502), Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.